Colorado, session 2026A, HB1419.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) H.R. 1 of the 119th Congress (2025-26), Pub. L. 119-21 had a
significantly negative impact on Colorado's financial outlook;
(b) H.R. 1 was signed into law on July 4, 2025, four days after the
end of state fiscal year 2024-25, which meant that there was insufficient
time to adjust revenue accruals and the certification of the amount of state
fiscal year spending in excess of the constitutional limitation on state fiscal
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

year spending;
(c) H.R. 1 impacted state 2025 income tax year revenue, which
revenue would typically contribute to both state fiscal year 2024-25 and
state fiscal year 2025-26 state revenue, but since H.R. 1 was signed into law
after the end of state fiscal year 2024-25, the impact on state 2025 income
tax year revenue was only accrued to state fiscal year 2025-26;
(d) H.R.1 currently has an effective 18-month impact on state fiscal
year 2025-26 state revenue and no impact on state fiscal year 2024-25 state
revenue;
(e) Although not predicted by current revenue forecasts, if the
18-month impact of H.R. 1 on state fiscal year 2025-26 revenue results in
state fiscal year spending for that year to exceed the constitutional limitation
on state fiscal year spending, then, while the actual impacts of H.R. 1 on
state revenues may differ from what was certified for state fiscal years
2024-25 and 2025-26, correcting the accounting of state fiscal year 2024-25
state fiscal year spending to reflect the revenue reductions caused by H.R.
1 would only shift certified state revenue in excess of the constitutional
limitation on state fiscal year spending between state fiscal years 2024-25
and 2025-26. Therefore, if 2025-26 state fiscal year spending exceeds the
constitutional limitation on state fiscal year spending, there is no need to
correct the calculation of 2024-25 state fiscal year spending because the
cumulative amount of state revenue that would be refunded to taxpayers
between state fiscal years 2024-25 and 2025-26 under existing accounting
would be the same regardless of the fiscal year in which the impact of H.R.
1 is accounted for.
(f) Based on preliminary estimates presented by the office of state
planning and budgeting to the executive committee of the legislative
council and the joint budget committee in July and August of 2025, if
accruals of state fiscal year 2024-25 state revenues would have updated to
reflect the impact of H.R.1 on state fiscal year 2024-25 state revenues, the
revenue reductions caused by H.R. 1 would have potentially meant that state
fiscal year 2024-25 state fiscal year spending did not exceed the
constitutional limitation on state fiscal year spending; however, under
current law, state fiscal year 2024-25 state fiscal year spending did exceed
the constitutional limitation on state fiscal year spending and the state is
required to refund that excess revenue;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1419

(g) Based on state income tax revenue collections received that are
tied to activity in the first half of 2025, H.R.1 lowered the state income tax
revenue that the state actually received for state fiscal year 2024-25 when
compared to the currently booked accruals of that state income tax revenue,
which resulted in an inaccurate calculation of state fiscal year 2024-25 state
fiscal year spending;
(h) If the office of the state controller discovers an error involving
a prior state fiscal year, the office of the state controller may correct that
error by increasing or decreasing state fiscal year spending for the relevant
state fiscal year;
(i) If an adjustment of state fiscal year spending cannot be made
under current law, the plenary power of the General Assembly allows the
General Assembly to enact legislation that facilitates compliance with
article X, section (20) of the Colorado constitution (TABOR) and may
direct the office of the state controller to prepare the annual finance report
that certifies the state's compliance with TABOR in a manner that complies
with that statutory direction; and
(j) This act requires the office of the state controller to correct the
accounting of state fiscal year 2024-25 fiscal year spending to reflect H.R.1
and to make corresponding changes to the future refund of state fiscal year
spending that exceeds the constitutional limitation on state fiscal year
spending.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-77-103.7, add (4.5)
as follows:
24-77-103.7. Over-refunds of state revenues - definitions.
(4.5) IF IN SEPTEMBER 2026 THE CONTROLLER CERTIFIES PURSUANT
TO SECTION 24-77-106.5 (1) THAT STATE FISCAL YEAR 2025-26 STATE
REVENUES DID NOT EXCEED THE LIMITATION ON STATE FISCAL YEAR
SPENDING IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 (7)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2025-26:
(a) BEFORE NOVEMBER 16, 2026, THE CONTROLLER SHALL
DETERMINE AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1419

(I) THE AMOUNT THAT THE STATE IS REQUIRED TO REFUND
PURSUANT TO SECTION 20 (7)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION
FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2024-25, AS CERTIFIED IN THE ANNUAL
COMPREHENSIVE FINANCIAL REPORT OF THE STATE THAT THE STATE
CONTROLLER PUBLISHED FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2024-25; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT THAT THE STATE WOULD HAVE BEEN REQUIRED TO
REFUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 20 (7)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2024-25 AS A RESULT OF THE
REDUCTION OF STATE REVENUES FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2024-25 CAUSED
BY H.R. 1 OF THE 119TH CONGRESS (2025-26), PUB. L. 119-21, AS
DETERMINED BY THE CONTROLLER, THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND
BUDGETING, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(b) FOR PURPOSES OF THE CALCULATION SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION
(4) OF THIS SECTION AND SECTION 24-77-103.5 (2), THE AMOUNT OF THE
OVER-REFUND FOR THE FISCAL YEAR COMMENCING ON JULY 1, 2024, THAT
IS USED FOR THE REDUCTION SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS
SECTION IS EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE CONTROLLER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION AND,
NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL ONLY BE USED
FOR FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, AND SHALL NOT
EXCEED ONE-HALF OF THE AMOUNT CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (4.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 3. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$18,021 is appropriated to the legislative department for use by the office
of the state auditor. This appropriation is from the general fund and is based
on an assumption that the office will require an additional 0.2 FTE. The
office may use this appropriation to implement this act.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1419

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1419